Georgia statutes. TITLE 8 Buildings and Housing
PART 6 Providing Housing for Persons Engaged in National Defense Industries or Activities

8-3-130.
Declaration of necessity.

The preparation for national defense requires a great migration of persons to engage in national defense industries and activities which would be jeopardized unless housing is available for such persons. An acute shortage of housing for such persons exists or impends in localities in the state. It is therefore of vital importance that all agencies qualified to do so have the powers and authority to develop and administer projects to provide housing for persons engaged in war or national defense activities and to aid and cooperate with the federal government in making such housing available for such persons.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 1951, p. 607, § 1.

8-3-131.
Definitions.

As used in this part, the term:

“City” means any city in this state;

“Federal government” means the United States government and any department, agency, or instrumentality thereof; and

“Persons” means an individual and those members of his family living with him.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 161, § 6; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 8/SB 429.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “in this state” for “in the state” in paragraph (1).

8-3-132.
Conditions precedent to exercise of powers by an authority; scope of rights and powers of an authority generally.

Any housing authority established pursuant to this article may undertake the development or administration, or both, of projects to provide housing for persons engaged or to be engaged in national defense industries or activities if it finds that an acute shortage of housing for such persons exists or impends in its area of operation or any part thereof and that the necessary housing would not otherwise be provided when needed.

In the ownership, development, or administration of projects under this part, a housing authority shall have all the rights, powers, privileges, and immunities that it has under any provision of law relating to the ownership, development, or administration of low-rent housing and slum clearance projects in the same manner as though all the provisions of law applicable thereto were applicable to projects developed or administered hereunder, provided that a housing authority may, notwithstanding the provisions of other laws, make and agree to make, with respect to any project owned and administered by it under this part, such payments for services and facilities furnished for such project by the city, county, or other political subdivision of the state in which such project is located as may be agreed upon; provided, further, that a project developed or administered under this part by a housing authority to provide housing for persons engaged or to be engaged in national defense industries or activities shall not be subject to the limitations provided in Code Section 8-3-12 or in the second sentence of Code Section 8-3-11.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 161, § 2; Ga. L. 1951, p. 607, § 2.

8-3-133.
Existence of war or national emergency as condition precedent to initiation of project.

No housing authority shall initiate the development of any housing project under this part after the termination of a period of war or national emergency as declared by the President or the Congress of the United States.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section, housing authorities may initiate projects within areas which, as of January 1, 1981, are designated as impacted areas in which housing is necessary in the interest of national security, for purposes of Section 810(b) of the federal National Housing Act.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 161, § 9; Ga. L. 1951, p. 607, § 3; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1420, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 8.

8-3-134.
Cooperation by an authority with federal government, other public bodies, and private agencies; leases of projects by an authority from federal government.

A housing authority may exercise any or all of its powers to aid and cooperate with the federal government in making housing available for persons engaged or to be engaged in national defense industries or activities; may act as agent for the federal government in developing and administering projects undertaken by the federal government to provide such housing; may lease such projects from the federal government; and may arrange with other public bodies and with private agencies for such services and facilities as may be needed for such projects.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 161, § 3; Ga. L. 1951, p. 127, § 2; Ga. L. 1951, p. 607, § 2; Ga. L. 1959, p. 141, § 2; Ga. L. 1962, p. 734, § 2.

8-3-135.
Aid and cooperation by state public bodies in development and administration of projects.

With respect to projects undertaken by a housing authority or the federal government to provide housing for persons engaged or to be engaged in national defense industries or activities, any state public body, as defined in Code Section 8-3-152, shall have all the rights and powers to aid and cooperate in the development or administration of such projects that it has under any provision of law relating to its aiding or cooperating in the development or administration of low-rent housing and slum clearance projects in the same manner as though all the provisions of law applicable thereto were applicable to projects undertaken by a housing authority or by the federal government to provide housing for persons engaged or to be engaged in national defense industries or activities.

With respect to projects located outside the territorial boundaries of a state public body which are undertaken by a housing authority or the federal government to provide housing for persons engaged or to be engaged in national defense industries or activities, such state public body may furnish or contract to furnish, upon such terms as it deems advisable, public services or facilities for any such project if the governing body of the city or county, as the case may be, in which such project is located shall, by resolution, consent thereto.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 161, § 4; Ga. L. 1951, p. 607, § 2.

8-3-136.
Issuance of bonds, notes, and other obligations by an authority.

The development of a project shall be deemed to have been initiated under this part if a housing authority has issued any bonds, notes, or other obligations to finance the cost thereof.

Bonds or other obligations issued by a housing authority for a project developed or administered under this part shall be security for public deposits and legal investments to the same extent and for the same persons, institutions, associations, corporations, bodies, and officers as bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to other provisions of this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 161, §§ 5, 6; Ga. L. 1951, p. 127, § 3; Ga. L. 1959, p. 141, § 3; Ga. L. 1962, p. 734, § 3; Ga. L. 1971, p. 94, § 1.

8-3-137.
Authorization for an authority to undertake projects and to cooperate with or act as agent for federal government; applicability of limitations, restrictions, and requirements in other; scope of powers.

This part shall constitute an independent authorization for a housing authority to undertake the development or administration of projects to provide housing for persons engaged or to be engaged in national defense industries or activities and to cooperate with, or act as agent for, the federal government in the development or administration of projects undertaken by the federal government to make housing available for such persons. In acting under this part, a housing authority shall not be subject to any limitations, restrictions, or requirements of other laws (except those relating to land acquisition) which prescribe or limit the procedure or action to be taken in the development or administration of any buildings, property, or public works, including, but not limited to, low-rent housing and slum clearance projects or undertakings or projects of municipal or public corporations or political subdivisions or agencies of the state.

A housing authority may do any and all things necessary or desirable to cooperate with, or act as agent for, the federal government, or to secure financial aid, for the expeditious development or the administration of projects to make housing available for persons engaged or to be engaged in national defense industries or activities and to effectuate the purposes of this part.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 161, § 7; Ga. L. 1951, p. 127, § 2; Ga. L. 1951, p. 607, § 2; Ga. L. 1959, p. 141, § 2; Ga. L. 1962, p. 734, § 2.